Utah statutes.
32B-6-803.   Commission's power to issue reception center license.

(1)  Before a person may store, sell, offer for sale, or furnish an alcoholic product on its premises as a reception center, the person shall first obtain a reception center license from the commission in accordance with this part.

(2)  The commission may issue a reception center license to establish reception center licensed premises at places and in numbers the commission considers proper for the storage, sale, offer for sale, furnishing, and consumption of an alcoholic product on premises operated as a reception center.

(3)  Subject to Section 32B-1-201, the commission may not issue a total number of reception center licenses that at any time exceeds the number determined by dividing the population of the state by 56,313.

(4)  The commission may not issue a reception center license for premises that do not meet the proximity requirements of Section 32B-1-202.

